packrat/lib/x86_64-pc-linux-gnu/3.5.3/sylly/tests/testthat/hyph-xy.pat.txt
.im5b
.in1
.in3d
bigu3
b1il
b2ile
c3ni
1c2o2
4co.
co3mo4
comp4
con1
e5gur
e1h2
e5ho
enov3
en2s
ens5al
2erz
4es.
es5am
hdu4
he2
4he.
ib3era
ib1i
ibio4
id3ul
ie2
4iec
in4aw
2inc
inc4tua
it5icu
it1ie
it3ig
5lisse
l1it
l2it.
2m1ous
m1p
m3pa
nres5tr
4n1s
ns2c
n3sh2
n2si
n2si
ns3ib
ns3ib
n4sic
4olyt
2om
o1ma
pprob5a
1pr2
prac1
rd5ous
r2e
4re.
siast5
4s1ib
s3icat
